Missouri, session 2026, HB3498.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 217.695, 217.720, and 217.722, RSMo, are repealed and four
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 217.695, 217.720, 217.722, and
217.723, to read as follows:
217.695. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Chief law enforcement official", the county sheriff, chief of police or other public
official responsible for enforcement of criminal laws within a county or city not within a
county;
(2) "County" includes a city not within a county;
(3) "Offender", a person in the custody of the department or under the supervision of
the division of probation and parole.
2. (1) Each offender to be released from custody of the department who will be under
the supervision of the division of probation and parole, except an offender transferred to
another state pursuant to the interstate corrections compact, shall shortly before release be
required to: complete a registration form indicating his or her intended address upon release,
employer, parent's address, and such other information as may be required; submit to
photographs; submit to fingerprints; or undergo other identification procedures including but
not limited to hair samples or other identification indicia. All data and indicia of
identification shall be compiled in duplicate, with one set to be retained by the department,
and one set for the chief law enforcement official of the county of intended residence.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3498 2
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the division of
probation and parole shall forward the terms and conditions of an offender's probation
or parole to the Missouri state highway patrol within five business days of an offender's
release from custody of the department of corrections and entry into supervision by the
division. Such terms and conditions of probation or parole shall be recorded in the
Missouri uniform law enforcement system (MULES), where such information is
available to members of the criminal justice system, and other entities as provided by
law, upon inquiry.
3. Any offender subject to the provisions of this section who changes his or her
county of residence shall, in addition to notifying the division of probation and parole, notify
and register with the chief law enforcement official of the county of residence within seven
days after he or she changes his or her residence to that county.
4. Failure by an offender to register with the chief law enforcement official upon a
change in the county of his or her residence shall be cause for revocation of the parole of the
person except for good cause shown.
5. The department, the division of probation and parole, and the chief law
enforcement official shall cause the information collected on the initial registration and any
subsequent changes in residence or registration to be recorded with the highway patrol
criminal information system.
6. The director of the department of public safety shall design and distribute the
registration forms required by this section and shall provide any administrative assistance
needed to facilitate the provisions of this section.
217.720. 1. At any time during release on parole or conditional release the division of
probation and parole may issue a warrant for the arrest of a released offender for violation of
any of the conditions of parole or conditional release. The warrant shall authorize any law
enforcement officer to return the offender to the actual custody of the correctional center from
which the offender was released, or to any other suitable facility designated by the division.
If any parole or probation officer has probable cause to believe that such offender has violated
a condition of parole or conditional release, the probation or parole officer may issue a
warrant for the arrest of the offender. The probation or parole officer may effect the arrest or
may deputize any officer with the power of arrest to do so by giving the officer a copy of the
warrant which shall outline the circumstances of the alleged violation and contain the
statement that the offender has, in the judgment of the probation or parole officer, violated
conditions of parole or conditional release. The warrant delivered with the offender by the
arresting officer to the official in charge of any facility designated by the division to which the
offender is brought shall be sufficient legal authority for detaining the offender. After the
arrest the parole or probation officer shall present to the detaining authorities a similar

HB 3498 3
statement of the circumstances of violation. Pending hearing as hereinafter provided, upon
any charge of violation, the offender shall remain in custody or incarcerated without
consideration of bail.
2. If the offender is arrested under the authority granted in subsection 1 of this section
or under the authority granted in section 217.723, the offender shall have the right to a
preliminary hearing on the violation charged unless the offender waives such hearing. Upon
such arrest and detention, the parole or probation officer shall immediately notify the board
and shall submit in writing a report showing in what manner the offender has violated the
conditions of his parole or conditional release. The board shall order the offender discharged
from such facility, require as a condition of parole or conditional release the placement of the
offender in a treatment center operated by the department of corrections, or shall cause the
offender to be brought before it for a hearing on the violation charged, under such rules and
regulations as the board may adopt. If the violation is established and found, the board may
continue or revoke the parole or conditional release, or enter such other order as it may see fit.
If no violation is established and found, then the parole or conditional release shall continue.
If at any time during release on parole or conditional release the offender is arrested for a
crime which later leads to conviction, and sentence is then served outside the Missouri
department of corrections, the board shall determine what part, if any, of the time from the
date of arrest until completion of the sentence imposed is counted as time served under the
sentence from which the offender was paroled or conditionally released.
3. An offender for whose return a warrant has been issued by the division shall, if it is
found that the warrant cannot be served, be deemed to be a fugitive from justice or to have
fled from justice. If it shall appear that the offender has violated the provisions and
conditions of his parole or conditional release, the board shall determine whether the time
from the issuing date of the warrant to the date of his arrest on the warrant, or continuance on
parole or conditional release shall be counted as time served under the sentence. In all other
cases, time served on parole or conditional release shall be counted as time served under the
sentence.
4. At any time during parole or probation, the division may issue a warrant for the
arrest of any person from another jurisdiction, the visitation and supervision of whom the
division has undertaken pursuant to the provisions of the interstate compact for the
supervision of parolees and probationers authorized in section 217.810, for violation of any of
the conditions of release, or a notice to appear to answer a charge of violation. The notice
shall be served personally upon the person. The warrant shall authorize any law enforcement
officer to return the offender to any suitable detention facility designated by the division. Any
parole or probation officer may arrest such person without a warrant, or may deputize any
other officer with power of arrest to do so by issuing a written statement setting forth that the

HB 3498 4
defendant has, in the judgment of the parole or probation officer, violated the conditions of
his release. The written statement delivered with the person by the arresting officer to the
official in charge of the detention facility to which the person is brought shall be sufficient
legal authority for detaining him. After making an arrest the parole or probation officer shall
present to the detaining authorities a similar statement of the circumstances of violation.
217.722. 1. If any probation officer has probable cause to believe that the person on
probation has violated a condition of probation, the probation officer may issue a warrant for
the arrest of the person on probation. The officer may effect the arrest or may deputize any
other officer with the power of arrest to do so by giving the officer a copy of the warrant
which will outline the circumstances of the alleged violation and contain the statement that
the person on probation has, in the judgment of the probation officer, violated the conditions
of probation. The warrant delivered with the offender by the arresting officer to the official in
charge of any jail or other detention facility shall be sufficient authority for detaining the
person on probation pending a preliminary hearing on the alleged violation. Other provisions
of law relating to release on bail of persons charged with criminal offenses shall be applicable
to persons detained on alleged probation violations.
2. Any person on probation arrested under the authority granted in subsection 1 of
this section or under the authority granted in section 217.723 shall have the right to a
preliminary hearing on the violation charged as long as the person on probation remains in
custody or unless the offender waives such hearing. The person on probation shall be notified
immediately in writing of the alleged probation violation. If arrested in the jurisdiction of the
sentencing court, and the court which placed the person on probation is immediately
available, the preliminary hearing shall be heard by the sentencing court. Otherwise, the
person on probation shall be taken before a judge or associate circuit judge in the county of
the alleged violation or arrest having original jurisdiction to try criminal offenses or before an
impartial member of the staff of the division of probation and parole, and the preliminary
hearing shall be held as soon as possible after the arrest. Such preliminary hearings shall be
conducted as provided by rule of court or by rules of the parole board. If it appears that there
is probable cause to believe that the person on probation has violated a condition of probation,
or if the person on probation waives the preliminary hearing, the judge or associate circuit
judge, or member of the staff of the division of probation and parole shall order the person on
probation held for further proceedings in the sentencing court. If probable cause is not found,
the court shall not be barred from holding a hearing on the question of the alleged violation of
a condition of probation nor from ordering the person on probation to be present at such a
hearing.
3. Upon such arrest and detention, the probation officer shall immediately notify the
sentencing court and shall submit to the court a written report showing in what manner the

HB 3498 5
person on probation has violated the conditions of probation. Thereupon, or upon arrest by
warrant, the court shall cause the person on probation to be brought before it without
unnecessary delay for a hearing on the violation charged. Revocation hearings shall be
conducted as provided by rule of court.
217.723. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any probation or
parole officer or law enforcement officer with power of arrest may arrest a probationer
or parolee without a warrant if the probationer or parolee violates the conditions of
probation or parole in the presence of the arresting officer. The arresting officer, or his
or her agency, as soon as practicable, but no later than twenty-four hours following the
arrest, shall notify the board of probation and parole of the probationer or parolee's
arrest. The probationer or parolee may be detained in the county jail or other
appropriate place of detention until the probationer or parolee is brought before the
court as provided under subsection 2 of section 217.720 or under subsection 2 of section
217.722.
✔